Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 321.34, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. Permanent noncommercial fleet vehicle plates. The department shall, by December 1, 2028, do all of the following: a. Develop and implement a program to allow for a person to register and renew the registration of a noncommercial fleet vehicle. b. Design a special noncommercial fleet vehicle registration plate that indicates a noncommercial vehicle is a fleet vehicle, may be reassigned by the department for a registration year, and is exempt from the annual validation sticker requirements under subsection 2, paragraph âaâ . c. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to administer this subsection. House File 907, p. 2 d. For purposes of this subsection, ânoncommercial fleet vehicleâ means a vehicle that is part of a group of two or more motor vehicles registered in this state under common ownership or control that is used for business purposes and is not subject to chapter 326. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 907, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor